Hawaii, session 2026, HB2345.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the centralized system for managing school capital improvement projects within the department of education has contributed to a substantial backlog of deferred maintenance.  This structure has resulted in delays, reduced responsiveness to the needs of individual school communities, and challenges in managing project timelines and budgets. The legislature further finds that the school facilities authority was established by Act 72, Session Laws of Hawaii 2020 (Act 72), as a specialized agency focused exclusively on the development and improvement of public school facilities.  Act 72 intended the consolidation of facilities-related expertise within the authority, including the transfer of certain functions and positions from the department of education.  That consolidation has not yet been implemented. The legislature also finds that a decentralized, district‑based model for managing deferred maintenance projects will improve efficiency, accountability, and responsiveness.  Localizing management within geographically based districts will allow decisions to be made closer to the schools they affect and provide a phased framework for the authority to assume broader capital improvement responsibilities in the future. The purpose of this Act is to modernize the State's school facilities management by: (1)  Requiring the school facilities authority to establish geographically based capital improvement project districts for the localized management of deferred maintenance; (2)  Transferring vacant facilities development branch positions from the department of education to the school facilities authority; and (3)  Transferring all functions, duties, and funds related to deferred maintenance from the department of education to the school facilities authority. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part VI, subpart C, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-     Deferred maintenance project districts; established.  (a)  The authority shall establish geographically based capital improvement project districts to provide for the localized management of project design, construction, and administration related to deferred maintenance.  The boundaries of these districts shall, to the extent practicable, align with the school districts established for administrative purposes by the department. (b)  Each geographically based capital improvement project district shall be responsible for: (1)  Providing localized management and oversight of deferred maintenance project design and construction; (2)  Administering project budgets and managing project schedules to ensure timely and cost-effective completion; and (3)  Serving as the primary local point of contact for public schools within the district regarding deferred maintenance needs and projects. (c)  The authority shall assign dedicated staff, including a district facilities manager, to each geographically based capital improvement project district to carry out the functions described in this section. (d)  As used in this section, "deferred maintenance" means the repair and maintenance of a department-owned building, facility, or other improvement that has been delayed past the ordinarily scheduled repair and maintenance cycle." SECTION 3.  (a) All rights, powers, functions, and duties of the department of education relating to deferred maintenance are transferred to the school facilities authority. (b)  All vacant positions within the department of education's facilities development branch as of the effective date of this Act, including all associated funding for salaries and benefits, are transferred to the school facilities authority. (c)  All appropriations, items of appropriation, and unexpended balances of funds, including any federal funds, designated for deferred maintenance within the department of education are transferred to the school facilities authority. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purposes of establishing geographically based capital improvement project districts and implementing the transfer of positions and funds pursuant to this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the school facilities authority for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 31, 2055.